Georgia statutes. 
Strict compliance required. - Georgia General Assembly intended to reduce uncertainty by limiting the pool of individuals or entities upon which ante litem notice could be served for purposes of satisfying the notice requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(f); in other words, the court presumed the General Assembly meant what it said and said what it meant. Strict compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(f) is required. City of Albany v. GA HY Imports, LLC, 348 Ga. App. 885, 825 S.E.2d 385 (2019).

Mere notice insufficient. - Mere notice of injury, although in writing and announcing an intention to file suit, does not constitute a presentation of the claim or demand to the governing authorities of the municipality for adjustment so as to meet the requirements of this section. Jones v. City Council, 100 Ga. App. 268, 110 S.E.2d 691 (1959); Chiles v. City of Smyrna, 146 Ga. App. 260, 246 S.E.2d 177 (1978).

Notice of intention to sue held sufficient. - Written notice to a municipal corporation of the intention of a person injured to bring suit against the municipality at a certain term of court, to recover for alleged injuries, is a presentation in writing of such claim to the governing authority of the municipal corporation for adjustment as required by this section. Lewis v. City of Moultrie, 31 Ga. App. 712, 121 S.E. 843, cert. denied, 31 Ga. App. 812 (1924), overruled on other grounds, Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Claimant substantially complied with the statute as the claimant's letter to the defendant city included the elements of time, place, and extent of the injury since: (1) the termination of a contract between the parties was the subject of the letter and, therefore, the nature and the extent of the injury were communicated; (2) the plaintiff specifically referenced a conversation between a city commissioner and the plaintiff's president, so the elements of time and place were included; and (3) the letter even listed potential causes of action. Info. Sys. & Networks Corp. v. City of Atlanta, 281 F.3d 1220 (11th Cir. 2002).

Hazard notice filed by city not sufficient. - Issuance of a "Hazard Notice" by the city against the plaintiff did not constitute an ante litem notice on behalf of the plaintiff which would satisfy the notice requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Brown v. City of Chamblee, 211 Ga. App. 45, 438 S.E.2d 396 (1993).

It is necessary only that the city shall be put on notice of the general character of the complaint and, in a general way, of time, place, and extent of injury. Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931); City of Rome v. Stone, 46 Ga. App. 259, 167 S.E. 325 (1933); City of Atlanta v. Blackmon, 50 Ga. App. 448, 178 S.E. 467 (1935); Lundy v. City Council, 51 Ga. App. 655, 181 S.E. 237 (1935); Jones v. Mayor of Savannah, 52 Ga. App. 537, 184 S.E. 353 (1936); Mayor of Buford v. Light, 65 Ga. App. 99, 15 S.E.2d 459 (1941); Caldwell v. Mayor of Savannah, 101 Ga. App. 683, 115 S.E.2d 403 (1960); City of Atlanta v. J.J. Black & Co., 110 Ga. App. 667, 139 S.E.2d 515 (1964); City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969); City of Columbus v. Preston, 155 Ga. App. 379, 270 S.E.2d 909 (1980).

What is substantial compliance. - Requirements of this section are sufficiently complied with when the notice gives information sufficiently definite to locate the property alleged to have been injured, the amount of damages claimed, and sufficient data to enable the city authorities to examine into the alleged injuries and determine whether the claim should be adjusted without suit. Kennedy v. Mayor of Savannah, 8 Ga. App. 98, 68 S.E. 652 (1910); Mayor of Macon v. Stringfield, 16 Ga. App. 480, 85 S.E. 684 (1915); Marks v. City of Rome, 145 Ga. 399, 89 S.E. 324 (1916); City of Griffin v. Stewart, 19 Ga. App. 817, 92 S.E. 400 (1917); Sirmans v. City of Ray City, 32 Ga. App. 430, 124 S.E. 60 (1924); Scearce v. Mayor of Gainesville, 33 Ga. App. 411, 126 S.E. 883, cert. denied, 33 Ga. App. 829 (1925); Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931); Jones v. Mayor of Savannah, 52 Ga. App. 537, 184 S.E. 353 (1936); Olmstead v. Mayor of Savannah, 57 Ga. App. 815, 196 S.E. 923 (1938); Aldred v. City of Summerville, 215 Ga. 651, 113 S.E.2d 108 (1960); Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972).

Substantial compliance not shown. - When appellant gave oral notice to a representative of the municipal corporation and documents prepared by city employees and the city's insurer were not presented to the city by the appellant as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, there was no proper ante litem notice. Clark v. City of Smyrna, 212 Ga. App. 598, 442 S.E.2d 461 (1994).

This section does not contemplate that notice shall be drawn with all technical niceties necessary in framing a declaration for the purpose of the law was simply to give to the municipality notice that the citizen or property owner has a grievance against the municipality and it is necessary only that the city be put on notice of the general character of the complaint and, in a general way, of the time, place, and extent of the injury. City of E. Point v. Christian, 40 Ga. App. 633, 151 S.E. 42 (1929); Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931); Mayor of Savannah v. Helmken, 43 Ga. App. 84, 158 S.E. 64 (1931); City of Rome v. Stone, 46 Ga. App. 259, 167 S.E. 325 (1933); Olmstead v. Mayor of Savannah, 57 Ga. App. 815, 196 S.E. 923 (1938); City of Dalton v. Joyce, 70 Ga. App. 557, 29 S.E.2d 112 (1944); City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969); City of Columbus v. Preston, 155 Ga. App. 379, 270 S.E.2d 909 (1980).

Service of verbatim copy of petition sufficient notice. - Service upon the municipal corporation of a verbatim copy of the petition which the person injured intends to file in a suit against the municipality, which states the time, place, and extent of the injuries complained of, accompanied by a letter from the plaintiff's attorneys to the clerk of the municipal corporation reciting the name of the case and stating that "we enclose herewith claim in the above-stated matter as required by law," is sufficient as a presentation of the claim for adjustment. Lewis v. City of Moultrie, 31 Ga. App. 712, 121 S.E. 843, cert. denied, 31 Ga. App. 812 (1924), overruled on other grounds, Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Absolute exactness of notice not necessary. - When the notice states the time, place, manner, circumstances, and details of the accident causing the injuries for which the claim was made and the acts of negligence charged against the municipality as well as the amount claimed as damages, this is a sufficient compliance with the statute, and the fact that the claim filed with the municipality states that the plaintiffs claimed "35,000 from said municipality," and the action was filed jointly against the municipality and an individual is immaterial. City of Dalton v. Joyce, 70 Ga. App. 557, 29 S.E.2d 112 (1944).

This section recognizes, by the use of the words "as near as practicable," that absolute exactness need not be had; a substantial compliance with the section is all that is required; and, when the notice describes the time, place, and extent of the injury with reasonable certainty, that notice will be sufficient. City of E. Point v. Christian, 40 Ga. App. 633, 151 S.E. 42 (1929); City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969).

Words "as near as practicable," as used in this section do not make any difference in their qualification between "time, place, and extent of such injury," and "the negligence which caused the same." City of Atlanta v. Blackmon, 50 Ga. App. 448, 178 S.E. 467 (1935).

Slight inaccuracies of the facts will not render the notice invalid. City of Fairburn v. Clanton, 102 Ga. App. 556, 117 S.E.2d 197 (1960).

Variance between petition and notice. - If notice and petition correspond in all substantial respects as to matters, information of which is required to be given, the variance is immaterial. Langley v. City Council, 118 Ga. 590, 45 S.E. 486 (1903); Smith v. City of Elberton, 5 Ga. App. 286, 63 S.E. 48 (1908); Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931).

Petition need not actually follow the notice, and an immaterial variance between the two as to time, place, or extent of injury will not amount to a fatal variance. Mayor of Macon v. Stringfield, 16 Ga. App. 480, 85 S.E. 684 (1915); Williamson v. Mayor of Savannah, 19 Ga. App. 784, 92 S.E. 291 (1917).

Notice need not be as clear and specific as petition. - It would be entirely contrary to the purpose of this section to say that the negligence relied on must be as clearly and specifically set forth in the notice as in the petition; the object and purpose of the notice is merely to give the city an opportunity to investigate the matter in order to determine whether the city will pay without suit. City of Atlanta v. Blackmon, 50 Ga. App. 448, 178 S.E. 467 (1935).

Technical accuracy in filing claims is no longer necessary, and the old doctrine of strict and literal compliance, with the statute's attendant harsh and unfair results, has virtually disappeared from the law. What is required by this section is that there be substantial compliance with a demand or claim requirement. Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972).

Notice not required to specify amount of damages. - It is not a prerequisite to suit against a municipal corporation in this state, for injury to person or property, that the written notice required under this section should specify any amount of money claimed as damages. Maryon v. City of Atlanta, 149 Ga. 35, 99 S.E. 116 (1919); Maryon v. City of Atlanta, 23 Ga. App. 716, 99 S.E. 316 (1919); Mayor of Savannah v. Clarke, 42 Ga. App. 275, 155 S.E. 790 (1930); Mayor of Waynesboro v. Hargrove, 111 Ga. App. 26, 140 S.E.2d 286 (1965).

For contrary view that notice must specify amount of damages, see Mayor of Macon v. Stringfield, 16 Ga. App. 480, 85 S.E. 684 (1915); Williamson v. Mayor of Savannah, 19 Ga. App. 784, 92 S.E. 291 (1917); Scearce v. Mayor of Gainesville, 33 Ga. App. 411, 126 S.E. 883, cert. denied, 33 Ga. App. 829 (1925).

Ante litem notice is sufficient without inclusion of monetary amount. Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Specific amount of monetary damages required. - After the plaintiff was involved in a car accident with a police officer, the officer's motion to dismiss the plaintiff's complaint was properly granted because the plaintiff's notice did not substantially comply with the amendment to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 as the notice did not include any specific amount of monetary damages being sought from the officer that could constitute an offer of compromise; the amendment applied prospectively to all ante litem notices issued after the effective date of the amendment; and there was no constitutional violation for improper retrospective application of the amendment as the amendment affected only a procedure or remedy, and not any vested rights. Harrell v. City of Griffin, 346 Ga. App. 635, 816 S.E.2d 738 (2018), cert. denied, 2019 Ga. LEXIS 166 (Ga. 2019).

In the plaintiff's action for damages against the city and two of the city's employees after one of the city's firefighters was involved in a motor vehicle collision with the plaintiff, the trial court properly denied the city's motion to dismiss because the plaintiff's ante litem notice satisfied the plain language and purposes of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(e) as the notice stated that the plaintiff would seek to recover $1,000,000 in monetary damages, and that was a specific amount of monetary damages that could constitute an offer of compromise. City of Lafayette v. Chandler, 354 Ga. App. 259, 840 S.E.2d 638 (2020).

Trial court did not err in concluding that the appellants' ante litem notices failed to comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(e) and in dismissing the claim for monetary damages because the appellants were required to include a specific amount of monetary damages being sought from the city and it was undisputed that none of the notices sent to the city included a claim for a specific amount of monetary damages. Wright v. City of Greensboro, 350 Ga. App. 685, 830 S.E.2d 228 (2019), cert. denied, 2020 Ga. LEXIS 30 (Ga. 2020).

Plaintiff not bound by amount claimed in notice. - Addition of the amount is unnecessary and, if set forth, mere surplusage, and does not bar a recovery of a greater sum. Maryon v. City of Atlanta, 149 Ga. 35, 99 S.E. 116 (1919); Scearce v. Mayor of Gainesville, 33 Ga. App. 411, 126 S.E. 883, cert. denied, 33 Ga. App. 829 (1925).

It is not necessary that the plaintiff state any amount in the notice to meet the requirements of this section, and plaintiff is not bound by the amount of damages claimed in plaintiff's notice. City of Gainesville v. Moss, 108 Ga. App. 713, 134 S.E.2d 547 (1963), overruled on other grounds, City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994).

Words "extent of such injury" do not mean the amount of damages claimed in dollars and cents, but mean the nature, character, and particulars of the injury, and which should be stated "as near as practicable." Maryon v. City of Atlanta, 149 Ga. 35, 99 S.E. 116 (1919).

No need to disclose jurisdictional fact. - Neither in the title nor in the body of this section is there any requirement that claimants shall disclose any jurisdictional fact. Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931).

Plaintiff must show "substantial compliance" with section. - Under this section, it is a prerequisite to the recovery of money damages from a municipal corporation on account of an injury to person or property, that the plaintiff shall show a "substantial compliance" with the statute's provisions and not only that a written claim of the nature and contents specified shall have been presented before the suit to the governing authority of the municipality for adjustment, but that either the municipal authorities must have actually passed upon the claim, or more than 30 days must have elapsed between its presentation and the filing of the suit, within which the authorities failed to act upon it. City of La Fayette v. Rosser, 53 Ga. App. 228, 185 S.E. 377 (1936).

Three letters of protest to city department held sufficient. - When an unsuccessful bidder sent 3 protest letters to a city's procurement department, and received no answer, the trial court correctly ruled that the three letters complied substantially with the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. City of Atlanta v. J.A. Jones Constr. Co., 195 Ga. App. 72, 392 S.E.2d 564 (1990), rev'd and remanded on other grounds, 260 Ga. 658, 398 S.E.2d 369 (1990), cert. denied, 500 U.S. 928, 111 S. Ct. 2042, 114 L. Ed. 2d 126 (1991).

Letters held sufficient. - As required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b), the November 24, 1997 letter to the city's attorney notified the city of the date of the fire (June 9, 1997), the location (the plaintiffs' home), the extent of injury (the home was completely destroyed), and the negligence that caused the injury (the fire department's failure to respond to the fire); thus, the letter clearly provided notice that the plaintiffs seek reimbursement for the loss of the plaintiffs' home, furnishings, and personal belongings. Adequate notice does not require itemization of all damages sought as a result of the city's negligence. Canberg v. City of Toccoa, 245 Ga. App. 75, 535 S.E.2d 854 (2000).

Landowners substantially complied with statutory ante litem requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 as the letter the landowners sent to the city alleging damages from continuing nuisance the city allegedly maintained on the landowners property and that identified the nature and location of the damage, the cause, and the nature of the potential cause of action, sufficiently put the city on notice of the problem occurring on the landowners' property. City of Columbus v. Barngrover, 250 Ga. App. 589, 552 S.E.2d 536 (2001).

No precise standard for determining whether any given ante litem notice is substantively sufficient exists. Therefore, the trial court properly denied a city's motion to dismiss for failure to give proper ante litem notice because the landowners' letters were sufficient to put the city on notice of the general character of the complaint, namely the claim of a continuing nuisance on their property caused by the city's water drainage system, and in a general way, of the time, place, and extent of the injury, namely, the flooding was ongoing and that the damage amounted to a taking of their property. City of Greensboro v. Rowland, 334 Ga. App. 148, 778 S.E.2d 409 (2015), cert. denied, No. S16C0305, 2016 Ga. LEXIS 154 (Ga. 2016).

Notice found to be insufficient. - Letter written by the plaintiff's son failed to present any claim or demand for adjustment and, therefore, did not satisfy the statutory requirement for a written demand prerequisite to an action for injury to person or property; buried as it was amid reference to a prior letter (that antedated the plaintiff's fall), the generally poor state of the sidewalks downtown, the financial ability of the city to repair the sidewalks, multiple instances of poor zoning ordinances, the responsiveness of elected officials to property owners, the lamented absence of building requirements and the need to enforce existing zoning ordinances, the bare mention of the plaintiff's arm needing surgery after plaintiff tripped on uneven concrete was not sufficient to put a reasonable recipient on notice that the injury specified would be pursued as a claim for money damages against the municipality requiring investigation, analysis, and perhaps pre-litigation adjustment. Woodall v. City of Villa Rica, 236 Ga. App. 788, 513 S.E.2d 525 (1999).

Because a driver failed to present sufficient record evidence that a city received timely ante litem notice that the driver sustained a personal injury, much less the nature, character, or particularities of any such injury, but the notice submitted merely established that the driver sustained property damage, the driver did not substantially comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b); thus, the trial court properly granted the city summary judgment on that issue. Harris-Jackson v. City of Cochran, 287 Ga. App. 722, 652 S.E.2d 607 (2007).

Grant of summary judgment in favor of the city in negligence action was appropriate because the claimant failed to show that the claimant timely presented a written notice of the negligence claim to the city as required under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b). An unauthenticated, purported notice did not create a genuine issue of material fact for summary judgment purposes. Jones v. City of Willacoochee, 299 Ga. App. 741, 683 S.E.2d 683 (2009).

Trial court did not err in granting a city's motion for summary judgment in a citizen's personal injury action because the citizen's ante litem notice was insufficient when although the notice gave the date and the particulars of the citizen's fall, the notice failed to properly or even generally identify where the incident actually occurred; while the citizen previously gave an oral report of the incident, which allowed the city to investigate the actual site of the fall, the citizen could not rely upon such oral notice or the city's earlier investigations and repairs to satisfy the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Simmons v. Mayor of Savannah, 303 Ga. App. 452, 693 S.E.2d 517 (2010).

In a personal injury suit against a city, the trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of the city because the notice the pedestrian provided under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 did not accurately identify the address for the missing water meter cover the pedestrian was alleged to have stepped into, thus, the notice failed to substantially comply with the statutory requirement. It is not the geographic proximity of the addresses that matters; rather, to substantially comply with the statute, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, the notice itself must provide enough information for a city to be able to properly investigate and adjust a claim pre-litigation. Williams v. City of Atlanta, 342 Ga. App. 470, 803 S.E.2d 614 (2017).

Plaintiff's civil negligence complaint against the city was properly dismissed because the plaintiff failed to include a specific amount of monetary damages being sought from the city pursuant to the ante litem notice requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 as the notice the plaintiff provided was merely an estimate of potential damages, and the notice did not constitute a real offer of compromise which the city could have accepted; nothing in § 36-33-5 imposed an obligation on the city to notify the plaintiff that the plaintiff's notice was insufficient; and the fact that the city conducted a preliminary investigation of the plaintiff's claim and denied liability did not remedy the plaintiff's failure to comply with the requirements of the statute. Pickens v. City of Waco, 352 Ga. App. 37, 833 S.E.2d 713 (2019).

Formalities of Notice

Required contents. - Specified elements of notice are "the time, place, and extent of such injury, as nearly as practicable, and the negligence which caused the same." "Extent of such injury" means the nature, character, and particulars of the injury. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 requires a claimant to provide the relevant municipality with information about the events giving rise to a claimant's injuries as well as a demand for the specific amount of monetary damages the claimant is seeking for those injuries, which allows the municipality to make an informed decision about whether to accept the claimant's offer, make a counter-offer, or take other action to resolve the claim and thereby avoid costly, unnecessary litigation. The fact that a claimant is still undergoing medical treatment does not prevent the claimant from providing a demand for a specific monetary amount of damages as the claimant can include any prospective future costs into the specified monetary amount. Pickens v. City of Waco, 352 Ga. App. 37, 833 S.E.2d 713 (2019).

Oral notice insufficient. - Oral notice to the mayor and city manager, together with written notice to the municipality which was five days late, will not suffice. Allen v. City of Macon, 118 Ga. App. 88, 162 S.E.2d 783 (1968).

Oral notice to a municipal corporation or a representative thereof is not considered substantial compliance with the provisions of the statute. Gillingwater v. City of Valdosta, 177 Ga. App. 241, 339 S.E.2d 287 (1985).

Oral notice with appearance before council insufficient. - Oral notices followed by actual appearance before the mayor and council of the city in official session as the city's governing body, and the officials' assurances of indemnification, will not suffice and cannot create an estoppel. Allen v. City of Macon, 118 Ga. App. 88, 162 S.E.2d 783 (1968).

Written notice addressed to municipality sufficient. - Requirement that the ante litem notice be in writing addressed to the governing authority of the municipality is substantially complied with when the written notice is addressed to the municipality. City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969).

In order for notice to be in compliance with this section, the notice must be addressed to and received by the municipality or one of the municipality's departments or officials. Chiles v. City of Smyrna, 146 Ga. App. 260, 246 S.E.2d 177 (1978); Hicks v. City of Atlanta, 154 Ga. App. 809, 270 S.E.2d 58 (1980); Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Ante litem notice addressed to and received by mayor is sufficient compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Letter addressed to "Mayor's Office, City of Gainesville, Gainesville, Ga. 30501" created factual issue as to notice required under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 and precluded a grant of summary judgment. Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Notice to mayor and council. - Notice of damages for injuries addressed to the Mayor and Council of Greensboro instead of to the city in the city's corporate name is sufficient, and the fact that the notice attempts a compromise does not render the notice insufficient. City of Greensboro v. Robinson, 19 Ga. App. 199, 91 S.E. 244 (1917).

Leaving notice with clerk of city commission. - Filing of the required notice in writing in the office of, and leaving of the notice with, the officer who is the secretary or the clerk of the city commission, which is the governing authority of the city, and is the officer who is the custodian of the records of the city, is a presentation of the claim to the governing authority of the city as required. Davis v. City of Rome, 37 Ga. App. 762, 142 S.E. 171 (1928).

Notice required under this section must be given by person injured and having a claim because a city is only required to make adjustments with parties who make known the parties' claim and the parties' identity as claimants. Chiles v. City of Smyrna, 146 Ga. App. 260, 246 S.E.2d 177 (1978).

Notice may be given by one other than plaintiff. - When there is only one cause of action, a notice given a municipality setting out the time and place of the occurrence, the extent and nature of the injury, to whom occasioned, and the negligence which allegedly caused the injury is a sufficient "substantial compliance" with this section, although the notice may have been given by one other than the plaintiff in the present suit. Taylor v. King, 104 Ga. App. 589, 122 S.E.2d 265 (1961).

Subrogation notice from insurer insufficient. - Letter from the landowner's insurance carrier which fails to set out the time, place, extent of injury, or negligence which caused the injury and is nothing more than a subrogation notice letter is not sufficient notice under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Notice of a personal injury claim by a tenant is not sufficient as ante litem notice of a property damage claim by the landlord under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

There is no requirement as to name and address of claimant in this section; failure to state either does not render the notice insufficient or noncompliant with this section. Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972).

Even if claim requirement, unlike this section, demands address of claimant, that requirement is deemed satisfied if an address is given at which or through which the claimant may be found in order that the local government officials may make such investigation of the merits of the claim as may be desired. Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972).

Waiver and Estoppel

Knowledge of claim alone cannot work waiver of notice. - That the city governing authorities may have had knowledge of the fact that a party had a claim which the party expected to assert against the city, either from communications which do not meet the requisites of written notice under this section, or from a reference of the claim to an insurance carrier which undertook an investigation and settlement, cannot work a waiver of the notice, an estoppel to assert lack thereof, or toll the time for giving the notice. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969); Robinette v. Johnston, 637 F. Supp. 922 (M.D. Ga. 1986).

Notice not required when city, as party to contract, aware of claims. - Ante litem notice to a municipality is required for claims "on account of injuries to person or property." Property rights in contracts being intangible in nature rather than tangible, the notice was not required where the city, as a party to the contract or negotiations leading up to the contract in question, was well aware of the conflicting claims, if any, arising out of the contract. Holbrook v. City of Atlanta, 139 Ga. App. 510, 229 S.E.2d 21 (1976).

Notice not required for claims that were not for injury to person or property. - No ante litem notice to the city under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 was required for city water customers' claims for unjust enrichment, money had and received, and breach of the city code because the claims were not claims for injuries to a person or property covered under § 36-33-5. City of Atlanta v. Benator, 310 Ga. App. 597, 714 S.E.2d 109 (2011), overruled on other grounds, FDIC v. Loudermilk, 2019 Ga. LEXIS 186 (Ga. 2019).

Individual acts of city official will not create estoppel or waiver of this section when it is not shown that such city official had the actual or delegated authority of the governing body to waive such municipal rights. Peek v. City of Albany, 101 Ga. App. 564, 114 S.E.2d 451 (1960).

Statutory requirements for ante litem notice to the governing authority of the city generally may not be waived by the city or by an individual, even if that individual is the official directly responsible for the injury or for claims adjustment. City of LaGrange v. USAA Ins. Co., 211 Ga. App. 19, 438 S.E.2d 137 (1993).

City's insurer. - City did not waive the ante litem notice requirement because the appellant's claim was referred to the city's insurer. Clark v. City of Smyrna, 212 Ga. App. 598, 442 S.E.2d 461 (1994).

Notice sent to wrong party. - City waived the city's claim that the subject ante litem notice did not comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 by sending the notice to a city claims investigator, rather than the city attorney or the mayor. City of Atlanta v. Atlantic Realty Co., 205 Ga. App. 1, 421 S.E.2d 113 (1992).

City not estopped from invoking notice requirement by city attorney's unauthorized declarations. - Any unauthorized declarations on the part of the city attorney to the effect that no written ante litem notice would be required in view of the fact that the matter had already been brought to the city's attention would not estop the city from invoking the statutory notice requirement since there was no evidence that the city attorney had any authority to waive the statutory notice requirement on behalf of the city. Gillingwater v. City of Valdosta, 177 Ga. App. 241, 339 S.E.2d 287 (1985).

Governing officials of municipal corporation have no right to waive provisions of this section, and the municipality cannot be estopped by the representations of the municipality's governing officials to a claimant that the claim will be settled without litigation. City of Calhoun v. Holland, 222 Ga. 817, 152 S.E.2d 752 (1966); Allen v. City of Macon, 118 Ga. App. 88, 162 S.E.2d 783 (1968).

Municipality not liable when no notice and defect has not existed long enough to substitute for notice. - When the defective condition of a sidewalk is due to a failure to repair or to negligent acts of third persons, a city is not liable unless the city has had actual notice of the defect, or unless the city appears from the facts in the case that the defect could have been ascertained by the exercise of ordinary care, as when the defect existed for such a length of the time that notice will be implied. City of Rome v. Stone, 46 Ga. App. 259, 167 S.E. 325 (1933).

Two appearances by plaintiff insufficient to waive notice. - Although notice was in the possession of the governing body of the municipal corporation before whom the plaintiff twice appeared, that alone would be insufficient to waive written notice within the time limited. Holland v. Calhoun, 114 Ga. App. 51, 150 S.E.2d 155, rev'd on other grounds, 222 Ga. 817, 152 S.E.2d 752 (1966).

Reply to plaintiff's claim acts as estoppel to assert defects in notice. - When neither the pleadings nor the evidence reveals the slightest suggestion of restrictions on counsel for the city, the presumption arises that the city attorney had authority to bind the client by the solemn acknowledgment to plaintiff after receipt of plaintiff's letter giving notice of plaintiff's injury that, after investigation, the conclusion had been reached that the city was not liable. This amounts to an acknowledgment that this section had been complied with and the ante litem notice was sufficient, clearing the way for the filing of the complaint and estopping the city to deny the validity of the notice. City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969).

Evidence stricken when insufficient to show waiver or estoppel. - When allegations that the matter of plaintiff's injury was referred to a liability insurance carrier for investigation and settlement are insufficient to show waiver or any basis for estoppel, the allegations are improper in the pleadings of a tort action because the allegations are irrelevant to the issue and the allegations are properly stricken on motion. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969).

Issue of lack of notice must be raised at trial. - While the notice required before a suit against a city cannot be waived by the city authorities and is a condition precedent to recovery, a city which fails to raise the issue at trial cannot take advantage of the failure of a claimant to plead compliance with this section. Horton v. City of Macon, 144 Ga. App. 380, 241 S.E.2d 311 (1977).

Time of Notice and Action

Requirement of ante litem notice in this section is a statute of limitations. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969); City of Barnesville v. Powell, 124 Ga. App. 132, 183 S.E.2d 55 (1971); Barnum v. Martin, 135 Ga. App. 712, 219 S.E.2d 341 (1975).

Notice requirement subject to general laws tolling statute of limitations. - Requirement that the notice be given within six months from the date of the injuries, or else that the action therefor be forever barred, is itself a statute of limitations and subject to the general law of this state with respect to the tolling of statutes of limitations. City of Atlanta v. Barrett, 102 Ga. App. 469, 116 S.E.2d 654 (1960); Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

Former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5) did not purport to curtail a two-year period of limitations, in actions for personal injuries, as provided in former Code 1933, § 3-1004 (see now O.C.G.A. § 9-3-33). It required that, as claims relate to municipal corporations, ante litem claims prepared as fully set forth shall be presented to the governing authority for adjustment, and inhibits commencement of an action against municipalities until such claims shall have been presented. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Second proviso of this section is exception to general rule that statute of limitations runs and continues to run from time that a complete cause of action arose; that is, from the time that plaintiff could have sued. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Applicability of section providing for computation of time after commencement of action. - Ga. L. 1966, p. 609, § 6 (see now O.C.G.A. § 9-11-6) provided for the computations of time applicable to proceedings after commencement of the action. It did not apply in determining the time within which an action may be instituted, or when it may be barred by a statute of limitations. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969).

Section contemplates statute of limitations for injuries to person. - Term statute of limitations as used in former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5) so employed, though not expressly naming it, contemplated former Code 1933, § 3-1004 (see now O.C.G.A. § 9-3-33). City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Claim still pending when not considered within 30 days. - When a governing authority does not consider and act upon a claim within 30 days from the time the action was commenced, it must follow that the claim will still be pending before the governing authority. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Suspension of statute of limitations while claim pending. - Proviso in this section respecting the suspension of the statute of limitations is to the effect that the running of the statute shall be suspended during the time that the demand for payment is pending before the authorities without action on the authorities' part. This necessarily means that so long as the claim for damages is pending before the governing authorities of the municipality, and the authorities have not acted upon the claim, the statute of limitations is suspended. City of Atlanta v. Truitt, 55 Ga. App. 365, 190 S.E. 369 (1937).

When a claim not having been acted on by the governing authority is still pending under the plain and unambiguous language of the second proviso of this section, the statute of limitations is suspended not merely for 30 days, no action on the claim having been taken, but after 30 days up to the institution of suit. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941) (see O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5).

It was not intended by the legislature that a municipality by refusing or omitting to act upon a claim could thereby delay or prevent institution of suit, and have the statute of limitations operative against the other party during the same period. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Trial court erred by dismissing an arrestee's suit against a city alleging false arrest and other claims as being time-barred for not being filed within the two-year limitation period established in O.C.G.A. § 9-3-33 because the arrestee established that the arrestee had provided a timely ante litem notice, pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b), to the city and had properly included evidence of the notice in the record as an exhibit to the appellate brief. Simon v. City of Atlanta, 287 Ga. App. 119, 650 S.E.2d 783 (2007).

Municipality's failure to answer claim no bar to action. - When it appeared from the petition in which the plaintiff sought to recover for personal injuries alleged to have been received by plaintiff as a result of a city's negligence in the maintenance of one of the city's streets, that the cause of action accrued January 23, 1938, and a claim therefor was filed with the governing authority of the defendant municipal corporation on January 19, 1940 (within the period of limitations), and that the defendant had never acted upon the claim, the plaintiff's cause of action had not become barred by the statute of limitations upon the filing of the suit on February 24, 1940. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 64 Ga. App. 625, 13 S.E.2d 709, aff'd, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Even though there was no evidence that plaintiff provided written notice of plaintiff's claim as is required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 before filing suit since the trial court found that genuine issues of material fact remained regarding the city's liability for continuing trespass summary judgment was proper only as to those trespasses or nuisances which occurred more than four years prior to the filing of the complaint. Maxwell v. City of Chamblee, 212 Ga. App. 135, 441 S.E.2d 257, modified on other grounds, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994).
